Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-150
Application; county treasurer; duties.

The county treasurer shall use reasonable
diligence in ascertaining whether or not the statements in the application
for a certificate of title are true by checking the application and documents
accompanying the same with the records available. If he or she is satisfied
that the applicant is the owner of such vehicle and that the application is
in the proper form, the county treasurer shall
issue a certificate of title over his or her signature and sealed with the
appropriate seal.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 50;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 34.

Duty of county clerk is to use due diligence in ascertaining whether or not the facts stated in the application are true. Burns v. Commonwealth Trailer Sales, 163 Neb. 308, 79 N.W.2d 563 (1956).